Washington statutes.
RCW 9.16.070

Form and similitude defined.

A plate, label, trademark, term, design, device or form of advertisement is in the form and similitude of the genuine instrument imitated if the finished parts of the engraving thereupon shall resemble or conform to the similar parts of the genuine instrument.

[ 1909 c 249 s 348; RRS s 2600.]